District of Columbia statutes.
5-1413

Records as evidence.

The records maintained pursuant to § 5-1412, or reproductions thereof certified by the CME, are admissible as evidence in any court in the District; except that, statements made by witnesses or other persons and conclusions upon nonmedical matters are not admissible.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2914, 47 DCR 6308

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-2310.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2914 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).